Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB927.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 78.5522 is amended to read as follows:
The disability retirement provisions contained in this section shall apply to a person
whose last date of paid employment was in a nonhazardous position.
(1) Any person may qualify to retire on disability, subject to the following conditions:
(a) The person shall have sixty (60) months of service, twelve (12) of which shall
be current service credited under KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), or 78.615(1).
The service requirement shall be waived if the person is working in a
nonhazardous position that could be certified as a hazardous position based
upon KRS 78.5520, and is injured in line of duty resulting in an incapacity
to continue as an employee in the position that could be certified as a
hazardous position;
(b) For a person whose membership date is prior to August 1, 2004, the person
shall not be eligible for an unreduced retirement allowance;
(c) The person's application shall be on file in the retirement office no later than
twenty-four (24) months after the person's last day of paid employment in a
regular full-time position, as defined in KRS 78.510; and
(d) The person shall receive a satisfactory determination pursuant to KRS 61.665.
(2) A person's disability reapplication based on the same claim of incapacity shall be
accepted and reconsidered for disability if accompanied by new objective medical
evidence. The reapplication shall be on file in the retirement office no later than
twenty-four (24) months after the person's last day of paid employment in a regular
full-time position.
(3) Upon the examination of the objective medical evidence by licensed physicians
pursuant to KRS 61.665, it shall be determined that:
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 2/18/2026 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2151
(a) The person, since his or her last day of paid employment, has been mentally
or physically incapacitated to perform the job, or jobs of like duties, from
which he or she received his or her last paid employment. In determining
whether the person may return to a job of like duties, any reasonable
accommodation by the employer as provided in 42 U.S.C. sec. 12111(9) and
29 C.F.R. pt. 1630 shall be considered;
(b) The incapacity is a result of bodily injury, mental illness, or disease. For
purposes of this section, "injury" means any physical harm or damage to the
human organism other than disease or mental illness;
(c) The incapacity is deemed to be permanent; and
(d) The incapacity does not result directly or indirectly from bodily injury, mental
illness, disease, or condition which pre-existed membership in the system or
reemployment, whichever is most recent. For purposes of this subsection,
reemployment shall not mean a change of employment between employers
participating in the Kentucky Retirement Systems or the County Employees
Retirement System with no loss of service credit.
(4) Subsection (3)(d) of this section shall not apply if:
(a) The incapacity is a result of bodily injury, mental illness, disease, or condition
which has been substantially aggravated by an injury or accident arising out of
or in the course of employment; or
(b) The person has at least sixteen (16) years' current or prior service for
employment with employers participating in the Kentucky Retirement
Systems or the County Employees Retirement System.
(5) (a) 1. An incapacity shall be deemed to be permanent if it is expected to result
in death or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less
than twelve (12) months from the person's last day of paid employment
in a regular full-time position.
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 2/18/2026 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2151
2. The determination of a permanent incapacity shall be based on the
medical evidence contained in the member's file and the member's
residual functional capacity and physical exertion requirements.
(b) The person's residual functional capacity shall be the person's capacity for
work activity on a regular and continuing basis. The person's physical ability
shall be assessed in light of the severity of the person's physical, mental, and
other impairments. The person's ability to walk, stand, carry, push, pull, reach,
handle, and other physical functions shall be considered with regard to
physical impairments. The person's ability to understand, remember, and carry
out instructions and respond appropriately to supervision, coworkers, and
work pressures in a work setting shall be considered with regard to mental
impairments. Other impairments, including skin impairments, epilepsy, visual
sensory impairments, postural and manipulative limitations, and
environmental restrictions, shall be considered in conjunction with the
person's physical and mental impairments to determine residual functional
capacity.
(c) The person's physical exertion requirements shall be determined based on the
following standards:
1. Sedentary work shall be work that involves lifting no more than ten (10)
pounds at a time and occasionally lifting or carrying articles such as
large files, ledgers, and small tools. Although a sedentary job primarily
involves sitting, occasional walking and standing may also be required
in the performance of duties.
2. Light work shall be work that involves lifting no more than twenty (20)
pounds at a time with frequent lifting or carrying of objects weighing up
to ten (10) pounds. A job shall be in this category if lifting is
infrequently required but walking and standing are frequently required,
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 2/18/2026 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2151
or if the job primarily requires sitting with pushing and pulling of arm or
leg controls. If the person has the ability to perform substantially all of
these activities, the person shall be deemed capable of light work. A
person deemed capable of light work shall be deemed capable of
sedentary work unless the person has additional limitations such as the
loss of fine dexterity or inability to sit for long periods.
3. Medium work shall be work that involves lifting no more than fifty (50)
pounds at a time with frequent lifting or carrying of objects weighing up
to twenty-five (25) pounds. If the person is deemed capable of medium
work, the person shall be deemed capable of light and sedentary work.
4. Heavy work shall be work that involves lifting no more than one
hundred (100) pounds at a time with frequent lifting or carrying of
objects weighing up to fifty (50) pounds. If the person is deemed
capable of heavy work, the person shall also be deemed capable of
medium, light, and sedentary work.
5. Very heavy work shall be work that involves lifting objects weighing
more than one hundred (100) pounds at a time with frequent lifting or
carrying of objects weighing fifty (50) or more pounds. If the person is
deemed capable of very heavy work, the person shall be deemed capable
of heavy, medium, light, and sedentary work.
(6) Upon disability retirement, an employee may receive a disability retirement
allowance during his or her lifetime which shall be:
(a) For a member who began participating prior to August 1, 2004, an annual
retirement allowance payable monthly and determined in the same manner as
for retirement at his or her normal retirement date with years of service and
final compensation being determined as of the date of his or her disability,
except that service credit shall be added to the person's total service beginning
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 2/18/2026 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2151
with his or her last date of paid employment and continuing to his or her
sixty-fifth birthday; however, the maximum service credit added shall not
exceed the total service the person had upon his or her last day of paid
employment, and the maximum combined service credit for calculating his or
her disability retirement allowance, including total service and added service,
shall not exceed twenty-five (25) years. If, however, a person covered by this
paragraph has accumulated twenty-five (25) or more years of total service, he
or she shall receive added service necessary to bring his or her combined
service credit, including total and added service, to twenty-seven (27) years;
(b) For a member who began participating on or after August 1, 2004, but prior to
January 1, 2014, the higher of twenty percent (20%) of the member's monthly
final rate of pay or the monthly retirement allowance determined in the same
manner as for retirement at his or her normal retirement date with years of
service and final compensation being determined as of the date of his or her
disability; or
(c) For a member who begins participating on or after January 1, 2014, in the
hybrid cash balance plan as provided by KRS 78.5512, the higher of twenty
percent (20%) of the member's monthly final rate of pay or the retirement
allowance determined in the same manner as for retirement at his or her
normal retirement date under KRS 78.5512.
(7) No benefit provided in this section shall be reduced as a result of any change in the
extent of disability of any retired member who is normal retirement age or older.
(8) A person whose last day of paid employment was in a nonhazardous position who
is totally and permanently disabled due to a duty-related injury may be eligible for
benefits based upon the definitions, criteria, and requirements specified by KRS
61.621.
Section 2. Notwithstanding KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, 78.510 to
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 2/18/2026 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2151
78.852, or any provision of Section 1 of this Act to the contrary, a person whose last day
of paid employment was in a nonhazardous position on or after January 1, 2022, but prior
to the effective date of this Act, that could be certified as a hazardous position pursuant to
KRS 78.5520, who is injured in line of duty may apply for disability retirement benefits
pursuant to Section 1 of this Act if the person submits an application on or before January
1, 2027, using an application form and process developed by the Kentucky Public
Pensions Authority.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 2/18/2026 3:27 PM Jacketed